District of Columbia statutes.
34-1108

Revaluation.

The Commission may at any time, on its own initiative, make a revaluation of the property of any public utility.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 978, ch. 150, § 8, par. 9
Investigations of public utilities, assessing expenses, see § 34-912.
Valuation instruction, Commission’s request from court of appeals, see § 34-604.
1981 Ed., § 43-508.
1973 Ed., § 43-308.